Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PRINCIPALS SURVEY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota principals survey. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the University of Minnesota Center for Applied Research and Educational Improvement for the development, administration, and analysis of the 2026 Minnesota principals survey: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 210,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) The Center for Applied Research and Educational Improvement must post the 2026 principals survey results on its website, file a report in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195, and provide the report to the chairs and ranking minority leaders of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over education by January 15, 2027. new text end new text begin (c) Up to five percent of the appropriation may be used for grant management. new text end new text begin (d) This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end